Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 837.374 is amended to read:
837.374. (1) Except as provided in subsection [ (3)] (5) of this section, a person  commits a Class
A violation if the person possesses or controls an unmanned aircraft system and  recklessly causes
the unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;  or
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft[ ; or ].
[(d) Interfere with a wildfire suppression, law enforcement or emergency response effort. ]
(2) A person commits a  Class B misdemeanor if the person possesses or controls an un-
manned aircraft system and recklessly causes the unmanned aircraft  system to interfere
with a law enforcement, firefighting, search and rescue or emergency response effort.
[(2)] (3) Except as provided in subsection [ (3)] (5) of this section,  a person commits a Class A
misdemeanor if the person possesses or controls an unmanned aircraft system and  knowingly or in-
tentionally causes the unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;  or
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft[ ; or ].
[(d) Interfere with a wildfire suppression, law enforcement or emergency response effort. ]
(4) Except as provided in subsection  (5) of this section, a person commits a Class C felony
if the person possesses or controls  an unmanned aircraft system and knowingly or inten-
tionally causes the unmanned aircraft system  to interfere with a law enforcement,
firefighting, search and rescue or emergency response effort.
[(3)] (5) A person commits a Class A felony if  the person possesses or controls an unmanned
aircraft system and  knowingly, intentionally or recklessly causes death or serious physical injury,
as defined in ORS 161.015, to another person by causing the unmanned aircraft system to:
(a) Direct a laser at an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air;
(b) Crash into an aircraft while the aircraft is in the air; [ or]
(c) Prevent the takeoff or landing of an aircraft[ .]; or
(d) Interfere with a law enforcement, firefighting, search  and rescue or emergency re-
sponse effort.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1125 (SB 1125-B) Page 1
[(4)] (6) Notwithstanding [ subsection] subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a person commits
a Class A  misdemeanor if the person violates subsection (1) or (2)  of this section and the person
has one or more convictions under subsection (1) or (2) of this section at the time of the offense.
[(5)] (7) In addition to and not in lieu of any other sentence the court may impose, upon a
person’s second or subsequent  conviction under this section, the court shall, at the time of sen-
tencing, declare the unmanned aircraft system used in the  offense to be contraband and order that
the unmanned aircraft system be forfeited.
SECTION 2. The amendments to  ORS 837.374 by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by Senate April 3, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1125 (SB 1125-B) Page 2